Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-163
Action by Attorney General.

(RULLCA 809) The Attorney
General may maintain an action to enjoin a foreign limited liability company
from transacting business in this state in violation of sections 21-155 to
21-163.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 63.